src-fst-affixes-adpositions.lexc.md
The Erzya language postpositions can be broken into many subgroups
according to morphological and semantic criteria

Some of the nouns have defective paradigms:
€ кудыкельганть

ало:ал
alo-SPAT-1Arg

This allows for possessor indices, word end or focus

This allows for word end, possessor indices, predication

postposition that is in ablative case
алдо:алдо

postposition that is in elative case
потсто:потсто

postposition that is in illative case
эземс:эзем

postposition that is in illative case
эйс:э

postposition that is in inessive case
эйсэ:эйсэ, кисэ

postposition that is in lative case
ютков:ютков

postposition that is in locative case
ало:ало

postposition that is in prolative case
перька:перька

postposition that has no continuation пачк

postposition that is in ablative case
алдо:алдо

postposition that is in elative case
потсто:потсто

postposition that is in illative case
малас:мала

postposition that is in illative case
малас:мала

postposition that is in illative case
потс:пот

postposition that is in illative case
эйс:э

postposition that is in inessive case
потсо:потсо

postposition that is in lative case
алов:ало

postposition that is in locative case
ало:ало

postposition that is in prolative case
перька:перька

+Temp: K ;  перть

+Ela+Temp: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC ;  пингстэ

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/affixes/adpositions.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-myv/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/adpositions.lexc)</small>

---
